Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 1 COLORADO PUBLIC ASSISTANCE ACT
26-2-135. Medically correctable program - fund established - rules.

On or before January 1, 1997, the state department shall make preparations for the implementation of a statewide medically correctable program, referred to in this section as the "program". Such preparations shall include but are not limited to staff training, policy development, and rule-making pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

On and after January 1, 1997, the program shall be applicable to a person who:

Has been approved for state aid to the needy disabled;

Is determined to be unlikely to meet the disability criteria for supplemental security income;

Has a disability that can be corrected with medical treatment at a cost that does not exceed twenty thousand dollars so that the person can return to employment; and

Is not otherwise receiving workers' compensation benefits.

The program shall consist of the following features:

A process by which the state department shall determine whether a person qualifies to receive medical treatment so that the person can return to work;

A set of procedures for monitoring a person's recovery from the medical treatment and return to work after participating in the program; and

Annual reports to the joint budget committee and the house and senate committees on health and human services, or any successor committees, that identify the number of persons who received medical treatment pursuant to the program in the preceding fiscal year, their recovery rates and return to the workforce, and the amount of moneys spent on the program.

The cost of the medical treatment identified in paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section shall not be a benefit for purposes of articles 40 to 47 of title 8, C.R.S.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 99, p. 699, § 4, effective July 1, 1999.)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1438, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 699, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(3)(c) amended, p. 2044, § 76, effective June 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1999 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 203, Session Laws of Colorado 1999.

26-2-136. Personal identification systems for public assistance - committee to select methods. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 345, § 2, effective April 19.

L. 2001:

(2) amended, p. 1169, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1996, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1690, § 82, effective August 7.

26-2-137. Noncitizens programs.

Emergency assistance.

A general assistance fund is hereby established that shall consist of state general funds appropriated thereto by the general assembly. Moneys in the fund shall be used only for the purpose of providing emergency assistance pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (1) and shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly.

The state department shall allocate moneys in the fund described in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) to the counties for the implementation of the emergency assistance program pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (1) and rules of the state department.

The state department shall promulgate rules for the delivery of emergency assistance to a person who:

Is a legal immigrant and a resident of the state of Colorado;

Is not a citizen of the United States; and

Meets the eligibility requirements for public assistance under this article other than citizen status and is not receiving any other public assistance under this article.

Such emergency assistance may include but need not be limited to the following forms of assistance:

Housing;

Food;

Short-term cash assistance; and

Clothing and social services for children.

Sponsor responsibility policies.

The general assembly finds and declares that sponsors shall be expected to meet their moral and financial commitments to the immigrants whom they sponsor and for whom they sign affidavits of support.

The state department shall promulgate rules consistent with this section and federal law to enforce sponsor commitments for noncitizen applicants for or recipients of public assistance or medical assistance.

Enforcement mechanisms shall include but not be limited to the following:

Income assignment;

State income tax refund offset;

State lottery winnings offset; and

Administrative lien and attachment.

A recipient shall assign rights to any support under affidavits of support to the state of Colorado as a condition of receipt of public assistance or medical assistance under this title.

To the extent not preempted by federal law, the state department shall commence a proceeding or an action to enforce duties under an affidavit of support within a period of time to be determined by the state board after a recipient for whom an affidavit of support has been signed has been approved for public assistance or medical assistance under this title.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1252, § 3, effective July 1.

26-2-138. Refugee services program - state plan - rules - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Federal act" means Title IV of the federal "Immigration and Nationality Act", 8 U.S.C. sec. 1521 et seq., as amended, including any federal rules adopted pursuant to the federal act.

"Program" means the Colorado refugee services program established pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section.

"State plan" means Colorado's refugee services plan, described in subsection (2)(b) of this section.

The Colorado refugee services program is established in the state department. The program must be administered in accordance with the state plan developed by the state department and approved by the federal office of refugee resettlement within the federal department of health and human services pursuant to the federal act.

The state department is the single state agency responsible for the development, review, and administration of the state plan.

The program must provide the following, in accordance with the federal act and the state plan:

Refugee cash assistance;

Refugee medical assistance;

Refugee social services, which may include but are not limited to employment services, employability assessments, English language instruction, vocational training, skills recertification, and case management services related to employment; and

Any other services or assistance consistent with the federal act.

The program may provide other services or assistance to support refugee resettlement and integration. The program shall assist the Colorado office of new Americans in carrying out its duties and goals as specified in section 8-3.7-103 (2)(g), including the sharing of outcomes, partnerships, and the alignment of mission and purpose.

The state department shall adopt rules, in accordance with article 4 of title 24, to implement this section.

The general assembly may appropriate funds to the state department for the administration of the program.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-230), ch. 297, p. 2755, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(4) amended, (HB 21-1150), ch. 350, p. 2278, § 3, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 19-230, see section 1 of chapter 297, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

26-2-139. Food pantry assistance grant program - created - timeline and criteria - grants - definitions - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Colorado agricultural products" means all fruits, vegetables, grains, meats, and dairy products, grown or raised in Colorado, and minimally processed products or value-added processed products that meet the standards for the Colorado proud designation established by the state department of agriculture.

"Eligible entity" means, for the purposes of a food pantry assistance grant, either a food bank or food pantry.

"Eligible entity", for the purposes of a food pantry assistance grant, includes a faith-based organization.

"Food bank" means a charitable organization, exempt from federal income taxation under the provisions of the internal revenue code, that acquires and distributes food and nonfood essentials to other hunger relief programs.

"Food pantry" means an individual site that buys food or receives donations of foods that are then directly distributed to those in its community.

"Grant program" means the food pantry assistance grant program created in subsection (2) of this section.

"State department" means the state department of human services.

There is created in the state department the food pantry assistance grant program. The purpose of the grant program is to aid Colorado food pantries and food banks in the purchase of foods that better meet the needs of their clientele, which has expanded significantly as a result of the COVID-19 public health emergency.

The state department may contract with a third-party vendor to solicit, vet, award, and monitor grants. The selection of any vendor pursuant to this subsection (3)(a) is exempt from the requirements of the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24.

The state department is authorized to use up to five percent of the total funds appropriated to the grant program for the direct and indirect costs of administering and monitoring the grant program.

The state department or third-party vendor shall award one or more grants to eligible entities as soon as practicable after December 7, 2020, using money appropriated to the grant program. In awarding grants, the state department shall, at a minimum, consider:

Providing money to a wide array of eligible entities of different types and sizes;

Ensuring that money goes directly to eligible entities that are located in a variety of regions throughout the state;

The relative difference each award would make in the eligible entity's ability to meet the needs of its clientele;

The ability of each eligible entity to responsibly distribute the grant money in a timely manner;

The eligible entity's willingness to administer a client-needs survey as a vehicle for collecting input on the efficacy of its grant award; and

The ability of the eligible entity to create a feedback loop with the sate department that can inform implementation of the grant program in the future.

Grant awards, including those to joint applicants, must be at least two thousand five hundred dollars;

To the extent practicable, food purchased by a grant recipient using grant money must be designated as one of the following:

A Colorado agricultural product; or

An agricultural product that holds cultural significance for indigenous first nations people, or for other cultures or subcultural groups, including the ways in which those agricultural products are produced.

A grant recipient may use up to twenty percent of its grant award to cover the direct and indirect expenses associated with the distribution of food, including:

Transportation;

Food delivery;

Expanding staff costs;

Refrigeration; and

Storage.

A grant recipient shall not resell or apply other associated fees to the distribution of products purchased with money made available through a grant.

The state department may award up to one hundred thousand dollars annually from the money appropriated pursuant to subsection (6) of this section to a nonprofit entity to provide technical assistance to a grant recipient for training food pantries and providing information and assistance in purchasing and locating Colorado agricultural products. The state department or a third-party administrator shall select the nonprofit entity. The nonprofit entity must have experience working with food pantries and producers of Colorado agricultural products.

(4.5) (a) For state fiscal year 2021-22, the general assembly shall appropriate five million dollars from the economic recovery and relief cash fund, created in section 24-75-228, as enacted by Senate Bill 21-291, enacted in 2021, to the state department for the grant program that conforms with the allowable purposes set forth in the federal "American Rescue Plan Act of 2021", Pub.L. 117-2, as the act may be subsequently amended.

This subsection (4.5) is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Repealed.

For state fiscal year 2022-23, the general assembly shall appropriate three million dollars from the general fund to the state department for the grant program.

This subsection (6) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1422), ch. 116, p. 485, § 2, effective June 22.

L. 2020, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(1)(b), (2), (3)(b), IP(4)(a), (4)(b), (4)(c), and (5) amended, (HB 20B-1003), ch. 6, p. 35, § 2, effective December 7.

L. 2021:

(2), (3), and IP(4)(a) amended and (4.5) added, (SB 21-027), ch. 431, p. 2852, § 3, effective July 6.

L. 2022:

(1)(b)(I), (2), and (4)(c)(I) amended, (4)(d) and (6) added, and (5) repealed, (HB 22-1364), ch. 377, p. 2678, § 1, effective June 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 20-1422, see section 1 of chapter 116, Session Laws of Colorado 2020. For the legislative declaration in HB 20B-1003, see section 1 of chapter 6, Session Laws of Colorado 2020, First Extraordinary Session. For the legislative declaration in SB 21-027, see section 1 of chapter 431, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

26-2-140. Colorado diaper distribution program - diapering essentials - report - rules - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Diaper distribution center" means a community-based diaper bank or distribution center operating in Colorado, a public health agency created pursuant to section 25-1-506, or a Colorado nonprofit organization with a minimum of three years' experience distributing baby or toddler products.

"Diapering essentials" includes diapers, wipes, and diaper creams.

"Eligible individual" means a parent, guardian, or family member of a child who wears diapers and resides in Colorado.

"Program" means the Colorado diaper distribution program created in subsection (2) of this section.

There is created in the state department the Colorado diaper distribution program to provide diapering essentials to eligible individuals.

No later than thirty days after July 6, 2021, the state department shall solicit interest and cost distribution proposals from diaper distribution centers to administer the program. Upon the state department's approval, the diaper distribution centers may subcontract money received pursuant to this section to their partners as necessary to serve eligible individuals. The selected diaper distribution centers must be operational no later than thirty days after entering into a contract with the state department. The selection process described in this subsection (3) is not subject to the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24.

Notwithstanding the requirement in subsection (3)(a) of this section, the selected diaper distribution centers may operate for not more than twelve months after which the state department must commence a selection process that complies with the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24.

The state department may promulgate rules for the implementation of this section.

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year, the state department shall submit a preliminary report, and beginning in state fiscal year 2022-23, and each fiscal year thereafter, the state department shall report to the public through the annual hearing, pursuant to the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2. At a minimum, the report must include:

The total number of diaper distribution centers contracted with the state department pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, including any subcontractors;

The total amount of money awarded to each diaper distribution center;

The location of each diaper distribution center and the counties served; and

The total number of eligible individuals who received diapering essentials each year, disaggregated by each month.

For state fiscal year 2021-22, the general assembly shall appropriate two million dollars from the general fund to the state department for use by the diaper distribution centers for the implementation of this section. The state department may use up to one hundred thousand dollars or seven and a half percent of any money appropriated by the general assembly for administrative costs incurred by the state department pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-027), ch. 431, p. 2850, § 2, effective July 6.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-027, see section 1 of chapter 431, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

26-2-141. High-quality work management system - implementation - funding - repeal.

Beginning July 1, 2022, the state department shall begin work in partnership with counties toward implementation of a high-quality county work management system from joint state and county decisions informed by the joint agency interoperability system study. The work management system must be designed to provide a unified approach to efficiently and effectively serve county departments and clients of the state department. The state department shall provide a centralized process for county departments to request changes or customization in the work management system. If a county department's change or customization is approved, the state department shall have a mechanism to fulfill that request. The purpose of the work management system is to reduce administrative cost, streamline the application process for various benefit programs, and provide more time for better case management and improved access to program services that assist low-income households in purchasing healthy food, paying for medical expenses, and achieving economic stability.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate three million dollars from the economic recovery and relief cash fund created in section 24-75-228 to the state department for the purposes of implementing this section. Upon full utilization or expiration of the money appropriated from the economic recovery and relief cash fund pursuant to this subsection (2) for the work management system, the state department shall consider ongoing costs to operate and maintain the work management system.

Money spent pursuant to this subsection (2) must conform with the allowable purposes set forth in the federal "American Rescue Plan Act of 2021", Pub.L. 117-2, as amended. The state department shall either spend or obligate such appropriation prior to December 30, 2024, and expend the appropriation on or before December 31, 2026.

The state department shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2027.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1380), ch. 375, p. 2662, § 2, effective June 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1380, see section 1 of chapter 375, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

26-2-142. Colorado teen parent driver's license program - report - rules - definitions - appropriation.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Eligible individual" means an individual who is:

Fifteen years of age or older and under twenty years of age; and

A parent.

"Program" means the teen parent driver's license program created in subsection (2) of this section.

There is created in the state department the Colorado teen parent driver's license program to provide financial assistance for the cost of driver's education school training for eligible individuals and the cost to obtain a driver's license or permit.

The state department shall solicit interest and cost distribution proposals from teen parent organizations to administer the program. Upon the state department's approval, the teen parent organizations may subcontract with and pay money received pursuant to this section to the providers of the services as necessary to serve eligible individuals. The selected teen parent organizations must be operational no later than thirty days after entering into a contract with the state department.

For purposes of selecting a teen parent organization before July 1, 2023, to administer the program, the selection process described in subsection (3)(a) of this section is not subject to the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24. For purposes of selecting a teen parent organization on or after July 1, 2023, the state department shall commence a selection process that complies with the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24.

The state department may promulgate rules for the implementation of this section.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the state department shall submit a preliminary report, and beginning in state fiscal year 2023-24 and each fiscal year thereafter, shall report to the public through the annual hearing pursuant to the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2. At a minimum, the report must include:

The total number of teen parent organizations contracted with the state department pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, including any subcontractors;

The total amount of money awarded to each teen parent organization;

The location of each teen parent organization and the counties served;

The total number of eligible individuals who received driver's licenses each year, disaggregated by each month; and

The total number of eligible individuals who received training from a driver's education school, disaggregated by each month.

For state fiscal year 2022-23, the general assembly shall appropriate one hundred thousand dollars from the general fund to the state department for use by the state department to implement this section. For the 2023-24 state fiscal year and each state fiscal year thereafter, the general assembly may appropriate money from the general fund to the state department for use by the state department to implement this section.

The state department may use up to seven and one-half percent of any money appropriated by the general assembly for administrative costs incurred by the state department pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1042), ch. 283, p. 2033, § 1, effective May 31.